Washington statutes.
RCW 6.44.100

Enforcement of foreign judgments.

(1) If an action is brought to enforce a judgment of another jurisdiction expressed in a foreign money and the judgment is recognized in this state as enforceable, the enforcing judgment must be entered as provided in RCW 6.44.070, whether or not the foreign judgment confers an option to pay in an equivalent amount of United States dollars.

(2) A foreign judgment may be filed or docketed in accordance with any rule or statute of this state providing a procedure for its recognition and enforcement.

(3) A satisfaction or partial payment made upon the foreign judgment, on proof thereof, must be credited against the amount of foreign money specified in the judgment, notwithstanding the entry of judgment in this state.

(4) A judgment entered on a foreign-money claim only in United States dollars in another state must be enforced in this state in United States dollars only.

[ 1991 c 153 s 10.]